Utah statutes.
20A-5-402.5.   Certification of voting equipment.

(1)  As used in this section, "voting equipment" means automatic tabulating equipment, electronic voting systems, voting devices, and voting machines.

(2)  Each election officer shall ensure that:

(a)  the voting equipment used by the election officer is certified by the Election Assistance Commission; and

(b)  the voting equipment is certified by the lieutenant governor as having met the requirements of this section.

(3)  The lieutenant governor shall ensure that all voting equipment used complies with the requirements of this section.

